Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1952.
hereby enacts as follows: Section 1. Section 9711(d) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.* * *(d) Aggravating circumstances.--Aggravating circumstances shall be limited to the following:* * *(19) The defendant knowingly or intentionally desecrated or mutilated the corpse of the victim.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617